Utah statutes.
54-4-40.   Approval of certain agreements between an electrical corporation and municipality.

(1)  The commission shall review an agreement entered into between an electrical corporation and a municipality if the electrical corporation is required to obtain commission approval in accordance with Section 10-8-14, 54-3-30, or 54-3-31.

(2)  The requirements of Subsection (1) do not confer jurisdiction on the commission to regulate any electric service provided by a municipality.

(3)  Unless the commission determines that additional time is warranted and is in the public interest, no later than 120 days after the day on which an application to approve an agreement described in Subsection (1) is filed by an electrical corporation, the commission shall:

(a)  approve the agreement;

(b)  approve the agreement subject to conditions imposed by the commission; or

(c)  reject the agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 2013 General Session

